Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-6,126.01
Road name signs; authorized.

Local authorities may place and maintain road name signs on the same sign posts as signs under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation when highway visibility would not be impaired. Local authorities may also place and maintain road name signs in the right-of-way of any highway under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation when highway visibility would not be impaired.

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 17;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 195.